Idaho, session 2026, H0603.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-1613, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-1613. CAPITOL MALL AND OTHER STATE PROPERTY AND FACILITIES -- CAMP-
ING PROHIBITED. (1) No person shall camp on or in any state-owned or leased
property or facility, including, but not limited to, the capitol mall, ex-
cept those that are designated as a recreational camping ground, area or fa-
cility. Any symbolic tents or other enclosed structures shall be removed
from 9:00 p.m. local time to 6:00 a.m. local time, unless otherwise provided
for in any applicable rules promulgated by the department of administration.
The provisions of this section shall not apply or affect policies, rules,
statutes or leases on endowment lands, department of parks and recreation
lands or department of fish and game lands. For the purposes of this section,
the term "camp" or "camping" means to use as a temporary or permanent place of
dwelling, lodging or living accommodation, and which indicia of camping may
include, but are not limited to, storing personal belongings, using tents or
other temporary structures for storing personal belongings or for sleeping,
carrying on cooking activities, laying out bedding or making any fire. Any
person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of an in-
fraction. Such persons shall be required to remove all their personal prop-
erty from the state-owned or leased property.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Camp" or "camping" means to erect tents or other enclosed struc-
tures on state-owned or leased property or facilities at any time be-
tween sunset and sunrise, the use of state-owned or leased property or
facilities as a temporary or permanent place of dwelling, lodging, res-
idence, or living accommodation at any time, or any conduct that consti-
tutes the indicia of camping.
(b) "Indicia of camping" may include but is not limited to storing per-
sonal belongings, storing food for future days, using tents or other
temporary structures for storing personal belongings or food or for
sleeping or lying down, carrying on cooking activities, sleeping or
making preparations to sleep, including laying out a sleeping bag,


blanket, or other material used for bedding, making any fire, or doing
any digging or earth breaking.
(3) Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall
be guilty of an infraction. Regardless of whether a citation is issued,
such person shall be required to remove all his personal property from the
state-owned or leased property or facility.
(4) Nothing in this section shall preclude a person from erecting a tem-
porary side-free canopy or other similar cover without side walls to stay dry
during periods of rain or snow, including from sunset to sunrise, as long as
it is not used for sleeping or camping and it complies with any rules promul-
gated by the department of administration.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-1613A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-1613A. DISPOSITION OF PROPERTY. Any property remaining after is-
suance of a citation, any property on state property in violation of an Idaho
statute or administrative rule, or any property left unattended shall be
held by the agency or its agent removing the property in a secure location for
a period of not less than ninety (90) days. Notice shall be posted and remain
at the nearest reasonable location to the place of removal with the agency's
or agent's contact information for the ninety (90) day period. If property
is not claimed within the ninety (90) day period, the property shall be
deemed abandoned and the agency shall have the right to dispose of the prop-
erty. A reasonable storage fee as determined by the agency may be assessed at
the time an owner claims the property. The individual claiming the property
shall produce identification and shall sign a release form providing his or
her name and contact information and swearing that the property belongs to
the claiming party. If the provisions of this section are complied with, the
state of Idaho, its agents, employees and contractors shall be immune from
legal liability for the administration of this section.
SECTION 3. That Section 67-5709, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5709. MANAGEMENT OF STATE FACILITIES. (1) In addition to the
authority granted by section 67-1603, Idaho Code, the director of the de-
partment of administration shall have exclusive control of the capitol mall
properties identified in subsection (2) of this section and, where not oth-
erwise established by law, multi-agency multiagency facilities owned or
leased by the state of Idaho. The department of administration shall have
authority to promulgate rules relating to use of those properties, including
the authority to promulgate rules requiring a permit for various uses of the
properties. Violations of rules promulgated under this section shall be in-
fractions. The director shall have authority to sue to enjoin any threatened
or continuing violation of such rules.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, the capitol mall properties
shall include state of Idaho lands and buildings, together with any ap-
purtenant grounds and systems, including, but not limited to, electrical,
plumbing, sewer, water, heating, ventilation and air conditioning systems
as well as geothermal systems and tunnels, located between blocks one (1)


and one hundred thirty-six (136) as shown on the Boise City city original
townsite plat filed in the Ada County county recorder's office in book 1 on
page 1. Subject to the following, the capitol mall properties shall may be
identified in rules promulgated pursuant to this section:
(a) At a minimum, the capitol mall properties shall consist of the fol-
lowing grounds, buildings, improvements and real property in Boise,
Idaho: Joe R. Williams (700 W. State street), Len B. Jordan (650 W.
State street), Pete T. Cenarrusa (450 W. State street), Division of
Public Works (502 N. 4th street), Alexander House (304 W. State street),
State Library (325 W. State street), Secretary of State (450 N. 4th
street), 954 Jefferson (954 W. Jefferson street), Capitol Annex (514 W.
Jefferson street), Borah Building (304 N. 8th street), and Steunenberg
Monument Park (intersection of Capitol boulevard and Bannock street),
and the Idaho Supreme Court (451 W. State street); provided, that the
Idaho supreme court may regulate uses at the Idaho supreme court build-
ing and its grounds.
(b) The parking facilities, including appurtenant grounds and systems,
at the following locations in Boise, Idaho, shall also be within the
capitol mall properties: West State street parking facility, occupying
block 101 as shown on the Boise City city original townsite plat; 3rd
street and Washington street parking facility, occupying a portion of
block 105 as shown on the Boise City city original townsite plat; 6th
street and Washington street parking facility, occupying a portion of
block 96 as shown on the Boise City city original townsite plat; 8th
street and Jefferson street parking facility, occupying a portion of
block 66 as shown on the Boise City city original townsite plat; and 10th
street and Jefferson parking facility, occupying a portion of block 68
as shown on the Boise City city original townsite plat.
(c) The space within the interior of the capitol building shall be al-
located and controlled as set forth in section 67-1602, Idaho Code; pro-
vided however, that the executive and legislative departments may sub-
ject all or a part of such space to the rules promulgated pursuant to
this section as set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Rules promulgated pursuant to this section shall apply to proper-
ties not described in subsection (1) of this section upon the request of the
state of Idaho public entity owning or controlling the property. When such
a request has been made, the property subject to the request shall be iden-
tified by the director of the department of administration in rules promul-
gated under pursuant to this section. Violations of the rules adopted under
pursuant to this section shall be infractions. The director of the depart-
ment of administration and the governing authority of the requesting entity
shall have the authority to sue to enjoin any threatened or continuing vio-
lation of such rules. All state law enforcement personnel, any sheriff or
deputy sheriff in a county in which the property is located and any police of-
ficer in a city in which the property is located shall have authority to en-
force the rules for that property.
(4) Responsibility for law enforcement at the capitol mall properties
is vested in the director of the Idaho state police. In coordination with the
director of the Idaho state police, Ada County county and the city of Boise
are granted jurisdiction to enforce the laws of the state of Idaho, the or-


dinances of Ada County county, the ordinances of the city of Boise and the
rules promulgated pursuant to this section. The director of the department
of administration, or his designee, shall be responsible for security at the
capitol mall properties and has the authority to contract with private con-
tractors to provide security for persons and property at the capitol mall
properties.
(5) The director of the department of administration may pay person-
nel costs and operating expenditures incurred in the operation and manage-
ment of the capitol mall properties and the multiagency facilities from the
rents received therefrom. In addition to funding annual operating costs,
rental rates at multiagency facilities shall include a provision sufficient
to provide for the long-term maintenance and upkeep of the facilities, sub-
ject to the review and approval of the permanent building fund advisory coun-
cil. Proceeds accruing from such rental contracts and lease agreements af-
ter payment of personnel costs and operating expenditures which that are in
excess of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) at the end of the fiscal
year shall be deposited to the credit of the permanent building fund and ac-
counted for separately for each property. Proceeds from the rental of park-
ing spaces at the capitol mall shall be deposited upon receipt to the credit
of the permanent building fund. Said proceeds shall not be expended without
an appropriation and shall only be appropriated for the security, mainte-
nance and upkeep of the property generating the proceeds.
(6) Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to give the de-
partment of administration control or management over the garden level, or
the first, third or fourth floors of the state capitol building, which are
vested with the legislative branch of government.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.